Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 8 Investments, Sales, and Conveyances

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was effective January 1, 1998, to the extent that no vested rights of title, year’s support, succession, or inheritance are impaired, as provided by the version of Code Section 53-1-1 enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, as amended by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 1.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, effective January 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter, and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of §§

53-8-1

through 53-8-73, and was based on Laws 1764, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 302; Laws 1804, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 313; Laws 1805, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 314; Laws 1809, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 315; Laws 1816, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 319; Laws 1821, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 532; Laws 1826, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 323; Laws 1845, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 334; Laws 1850, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 338; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 91, §§ 1, 11, 12; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 242, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 378, § 1; Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 36, § 1; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 144, § 1; Ga. L. 1858, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1861, p. 32, § 1; Code 1863, §§ 2513-2520, 2522, 2524, 2525, 2527-2529, 3666-3669; Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 30, § 1; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 83, § 2; Ga. L. 1866, p. 65, § 1; Code 1868, §§ 2511, 2513-2523,
2525-2528, 3690-3693; Ga. L. 1869, p. 13, § 1; Ga. L. 1872, p. 32, § 1; Code 1873, §§ 2541, 2554-2564, 2566-2569,
3743-3746; Ga. L. 1873, p. 30, § 1; Ga. L. 1877, p. 115, § 1; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 49, § 1; Code 1882, §§ 2541,
2554-2559(a), 2560-2564, 2566-2569, 3743-3746; Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 128, § 1; Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 142, § 2; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3181, 3432, 3445-3457, 3459-3463, 3514, 4630-4633; Ga. L. 1901, p. 57, § 1; Civil Code 1910, §§ 3764, 3765, 4008, 4021-4039, 4094, 5176-5179; Ga. L. 1920, p. 80, § 1; Ga. L. 1920, p. 245, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 113-1517, 113-1519, 113-1520, 113-1701 through 113-1714, 113-1716 through 113-1724, 113-1801 through 113-1804; Ga. L. 1935, p. 483, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1939, p. 366, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 236, §§ 3-5; Ga. L. 1943, p. 416, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 476, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 178, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 657, §§ 13, 14, 19-22; Ga. L. 1959, p. 326, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 188, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 230, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 450, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1973, p. 718, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1135, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1524, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 974, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 882, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 23; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1553, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 9; Ga. L. 1988, p. 725, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 810, § 11; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1438, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1173, §§ 5, 6.